Florida, session 2026, HB357.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Driver Privacy
Act."
Section 2. Subsection (2) of section 119.0712, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
119.0712 Executive branch agency-specific exemptions from
inspection or copying of public records.—
(2) DEPARTMENT OF HIGHWAY SAFETY AND MOTOR VEHICLES.—
(a) For purposes of this subsection, the term:
1. "Foreign country of concern" has the same meaning as in
s. 692.201.
2. "Foreign principal" has the same meaning as in s.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb357-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 357 2026
692.201.
3. "Motor vehicle record" means any record that pertains
to a motor vehicle operator's permit, motor vehicle title, motor
vehicle registration, or identification card issued by the
Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles.
4. "Public-facing portal" means a web portal or computer
application accessible by the public over the Internet, whether
through a mobile device, a website, or any other electronic
means, which is established for administering chapter 319,
chapter 320, chapter 322, chapter 328, or any other provision of
law conferring duties upon the department.
5. "Secure login credentials" means information held by
the department for purposes of authenticating a user logging
into a user account on a computer, a computer system, a computer
network, or an electronic device; an online user account
accessible over the Internet, whether through a mobile device, a
website, or any other electronic means; or information used for
authentication or password recovery.
6. "Third-party company" means any marketing firm, debt
collector, insurance company, or data broker.
(b) Personal information, including highly restricted
personal information as defined in 18 U.S.C. s. 2725, contained
in a motor vehicle record is confidential pursuant to the
federal Driver's Privacy Protection Act of 1994, 18 U.S.C. ss.
2721 et seq. Such information may be released only as authorized
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb357-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 357 2026
by that act; however, information received pursuant to that act
may not be used for mass commercial solicitation of clients for
litigation against motor vehicle dealers and may not be sold to
or shared with a third-party company, foreign country of
concern, or foreign principal.
(c) E-mail addresses collected by the Department of
Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles pursuant to s. 319.40(3), s.
320.95(2), or s. 322.08(10) are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution and may not be sold to
or shared with a third-party company, foreign country of
concern, or foreign principal. This exemption applies
retroactively.
(d)1. Emergency contact information contained in a motor
vehicle record is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and
s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
2. Without the express consent of the person to whom such
emergency contact information applies, the emergency contact
information contained in a motor vehicle record may be released
only to:
a. Law enforcement agencies for purposes of contacting
those listed in the event of an emergency.
b. A receiving facility, hospital, or licensed
detoxification or addictions receiving facility pursuant to s.
394.463(2)(a) or s. 397.6772(1)(a) for the sole purpose of
informing a patient's emergency contacts of the patient's
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb357-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 357 2026
whereabouts.
(e) Any person or third-party company that who uses or
releases any information contained in the Driver and Vehicle
Information Database for a purpose not specifically authorized
by law commits a noncriminal infraction, punishable by a fine
not exceeding $2,000.
(f)1. Secure login credentials held by the Department of
Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles are exempt from s. 119.07(1)
and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This exemption
applies to secure login credentials held by the department
before, on, or after the effective date of the exemption. For
purposes of this subparagraph, the term "secure login
credentials" means information held by the department for
purposes of authenticating a user logging into a user account on
a computer, a computer system, a computer network, or an
electronic device; an online user account accessible over the
Internet, whether through a mobile device, a website, or any
other electronic means; or information used for authentication
or password recovery.
2. Internet protocol addresses, geolocation data, and
other information held by the Department of Highway Safety and
Motor Vehicles which describes the location, computer, computer
system, or computer network from which a user accesses a public-
facing portal, and the dates and times that a user accesses a
100 public-facing portal, are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a),
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb357-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 357 2026
101 Art. I of the State Constitution. This exemption applies to such
102 information held by the department before, on, or after the
103 effective date of the exemption. For purposes of this
104 subparagraph, the term "public-facing portal" means a web portal
105 or computer application accessible by the public over the
106 Internet, whether through a mobile device, website, or other
107 electronic means, which is established for administering chapter
108 319, chapter 320, chapter 322, chapter 328, or any other
109 provision of law conferring duties upon the department.
110 3. This paragraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset
111 Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed
112 on October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and saved from repeal
113 through reenactment by the Legislature.
114 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb357-00